Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3705
Dialysis patient care technician; qualifications.

The minimum requirements for a dialysis patient care technician are as follows: (1) Possession of a high school diploma or a general educational development certificate, (2) training which follows national recommendations for dialysis patient care technicians and is conducted primarily in the work setting, (3) obtaining national certification by successful passage of a certification examination within eighteen months after becoming employed as a dialysis patient care technician, and (4) recertification at intervals required by the organization providing the certification examination including no fewer than thirty and no more than forty patient contact hours since the previous certification or recertification.

Laws 2017, LB255, § 5.